Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska4-113
Public benefits; state agency; annual
report.

Each state agency which administers any program of
public benefits shall provide an annual report not later than January 31 for
the prior year to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature with respect
to compliance with sections 4-108 to 4-113. The
report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The
report shall include, but not be limited to, the total number of applicants
for benefits and the number of applicants rejected pursuant to such sections.

Laws 2009, LB403, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 10.